Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-461
Disrespect toward superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect toward his superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 61, p. 1576.